Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-430
Department; enforce act; powers.

The department shall enforce the Uniform Controlled Substances Act and shall cooperate with federal agencies, the Division of Drug Control, and other state agencies in discharging their responsibilities concerning traffic in controlled substances and in suppressing the abuse of controlled substances. To this end, it is authorized to: (1) Arrange for the exchange of information between governmental officials concerning the use and abuse of controlled substances; (2) cooperate with the Drug Enforcement Administration and the Federal Bureau of Investigation; (3) do drug accountability audits of all registered practitioners in accordance with the act; (4) provide laboratory analysis; (5) provide drug abuse education to schools, courts, and persons requesting it; and (6) rely on results, information, and evidence received from the Drug Enforcement Administration and the Federal Bureau of Investigation relating to the regulatory functions of the act, including results of inspections conducted by that agency, which may be acted upon by the department and the Division of Drug Control in the performance of their regulatory functions under the act.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 90;

Laws 1984, LB 403, § 1;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 10.